Washington statutes.
RCW 43.71.067

Qualified health plans—Prohibited marketing practices or benefit designs—Rules.

(1) For qualified health plans, an issue [issuer] offering a qualified health plan may not employ marketing practices or benefit designs that have the effect of discouraging enrollment in the plan by individuals with significant health needs.

(2) Unless preempted by federal law, the commissioner shall adopt any rules necessary to implement this section, consistent with federal rules and guidance in effect on January 1, 2017, implementing the patient protection and affordable care act.

[ 2019 c 33 s 16.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 33: See note following RCW 48.43.005.